Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6219
Regulatory entity, defined.

Regulatory entity shall mean any board, commission, agency, division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other endeavors in this state.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 19.